Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0662.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. In establishing Pure Michigan byways, the department shall consider the concept of the complete highway, which is a highway incorporating not only safety, utility, and economy but also beauty. The department shall also consider that in a complete highway pleasing appearance is a consideration in the planning and design process. The department may designate portions of a road as a Pure Michigan byway, if the department obtains a trademark license from the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act for the use of the words "Pure Michigan". Local governmental agencies shall take any action necessary to protect the integrity of a designated route as stipulated in the uniform criteria developed for the identification of Pure Michigan byways by the department. Sec. 7a. No later than 1 year after the date the amendatory act that added this section is enacted into law, December 30, 2015, the department shall designate as Pure Michigan byways all routes that are designated as Michigan heritage routes on the date the amendatory act that added this section is enacted into law, December 30, 2014 if the department obtains a trademark license from the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act for the use of the words "Pure Michigan". Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.